Missouri, session 2026, HB1953.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 563.046, RSMo, is repealed and five new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 563.046, 590.1065, 590.1250, 590.1252, and 590.1256, to
read as follows:
563.046. 1. A law enforcement officer need not retreat or desist from efforts to effect
the arrest, or from efforts to prevent the escape from custody, of a person he or she reasonably
believes to have committed an offense because of resistance or threatened resistance of the
arrestee. In addition to the use of physical force authorized under other sections of this
chapter, a law enforcement officer is, subject to the provisions of subsections 2 [and], 3, and
4 of this section, justified in the use of such physical force as he or she reasonably believes is
immediately necessary to effect the arrest or to prevent the escape from custody.
2. The use of any physical force in making an arrest is not justified under this section
unless the arrest is lawful or the law enforcement officer reasonably believes the arrest is
lawful, and the amount of physical force used was objectively reasonable in light of the
totality of the particular facts and circumstances confronting the officer on the scene, without
regard to the officer's underlying intent or motivation.
3. In effecting an arrest or in preventing an escape from custody, a law enforcement
officer is justified in using deadly force only:
(1) When deadly force is authorized under other sections of this chapter; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1953 2
(2) When the officer reasonably believes that such use of deadly force is immediately
necessary to effect the arrest or prevent an escape from custody and also reasonably believes
that the person to be arrested:
(a) Has committed or attempted to commit a felony offense involving the infliction or
threatened infliction of serious physical injury; or
(b) Is attempting to escape by use of a deadly weapon or dangerous instrument; or
(c) May otherwise endanger life or inflict serious physical injury to the officer or
others unless arrested without delay.
4. The use of a respiratory choke-hold for any purpose other than is authorized
under section 590.805 shall be cause for the law enforcement officer's immediate
dismissal and revocation of his or her license under chapter 590.
5. The defendant shall have the burden of injecting the issue of justification under this
section.
590.1065. 1. A peace officer shall intervene to prevent or stop another peace
officer from using physical force that exceeds the degree of force permitted under this
chapter in pursuance of the other peace officer's law enforcement duties in carrying out
an arrest of any person, placing any person under detention, taking any person into
custody, booking any person, or in the process of crowd or riot control without regard to
chain of command.
2. A peace officer who intervenes as required under subsection 1 of this section
shall report the intervention to his or her immediate supervisor. At a minimum, the
report required under this subsection shall include:
(1) The date, time, and place of the occurrence;
(2) The identity, if known, and description of the participants; and
(3) A description of the intervention actions taken.

Such report shall be made in writing within ten days of the occurrence of the use of such
force and shall be appended to all other reports of the incident.
3. A member of a law enforcement agency shall not discipline or retaliate in any
way against a peace officer for intervening as required under subsection 1 of this
section, reporting unconstitutional conduct, or failing to follow what the peace officer
reasonably believes is an unconstitutional directive.
4. When an internal investigation finds that a peace officer failed to intervene or
prevent the use of unlawful physical force under this section, such finding shall be
presented to the prosecuting attorney for a determination as to whether charges should
be filed. However, nothing in this subsection prohibits the prosecuting attorney from

HB 1953 3
charging a peace officer with failure to intervene before the conclusion of any internal
investigation.
5. In addition to any criminal liability and penalty, when an internal
investigation finds that a peace officer failed to intervene or prevent the use of
unlawful physical force under this section in an incident resulting in serious bodily
injury or death to any person, the peace officer's employer shall subject the peace
officer to discipline, up to and including termination, to the extent permitted under
applicable constitutional and statutory law, and the director shall revoke the peace
officer's license under chapter 590 upon receipt of notice of the peace officer's discipline.
Such revocation may be overturned only if the peace officer is exonerated by a court.
6. In a case in which the prosecution charges a peace officer with offenses related
to and based on the use of excessive force but does not file charges against any other
peace officer or officers who were at the scene during the use of such force, the
prosecuting attorney shall prepare a written report explaining his or her basis for the
decision not to charge any other peace officer with criminal conduct and shall disclose
the report to the public; except that, if disclosure of the report would substantially
interfere with or jeopardize an ongoing criminal investigation, the prosecuting attorney
may delay public disclosure for up to forty-five days. The prosecuting attorney shall
post the written report on the prosecuting attorney office's website or, if the office does
not have a website, make it publicly available upon request.
7. The offense of failing to intervene to prevent the use of unlawful force under
this section is considered an act of complicity and the penalty for such act shall be equal
to the penalty imposed against the peace officer who committed the original wrongdoing
for which the peace officer failed to intervene. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit
or discourage prosecution of any other criminal offense related to failure to intervene,
including a higher charge, if supported by the evidence.
590.1250. The provisions of sections 590.1250 to 590.1256 shall be known and
may be cited as the "Law Enforcement Accountability Act".
590.1252. 1. All peace officers in this state shall wear a video camera affixed to
the peace officer's uniform while on duty. The video camera shall record each
interaction between a peace officer and a member of the public. The recording shall
include both audio and video.
2. Law enforcement agencies shall preserve any recordings made by a video
camera under this section for a minimum of sixty days and make such recordings
available to the public through a statewide database within fourteen days of any
incident.

HB 1953 4
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to detectives or other peace
officers while they are working in an undercover capacity or to any peace officer in any
situation where the wearing of such a video camera would endanger the safety of the
officer or the public.
4. Law enforcement agencies shall develop policies and procedures necessary to
execute the provisions of this section prior to January 1, 2027.
5. The director of the department of public safety may promulgate all necessary
rules and regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and
chapter 536 are nonseverable, and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
590.1256. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if any peace officer is
convicted of or pleads guilty or nolo contendere to a crime involving the unlawful use or
threatened use of physical force, or is found civilly liable for the use of unlawful physical
force, the director shall revoke the peace officer's license under this chapter. The
director shall not reinstate the peace officer's license or grant a new license to the peace
officer unless the peace officer is exonerated by a court.
✔